Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB131.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "claimant" means a person convicted and subsequently
imprisoned for one (1) or more crimes that the person did not commit.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a claimant may bring an action in
the Circuit Court of the county in which the conviction occurred seeking
damages from the Commonwealth pursuant to this section.
(3) (a) In an action under this section, the claimant shall establish each of the
following by a preponderance of the evidence:
1. The claimant was convicted of a felony crime by the Commonwealth
and subsequently incarcerated;
2. a. The claimant's conviction was reversed or vacated, and either
the charges were dismissed or on retrial the court entered a
judgment of not guilty; or
b. The claimant was granted a full and unconditional pardon by
the Governor on grounds consistent with innocence; and
3. The claimant did not commit the crime for which the claimant was
convicted and was not an accessory or accomplice to the acts that were
the basis of the conviction.
(b) The court may give due consideration to difficulties of proof caused by
circumstances outside the control of the claimant, including but not limited
to the passage of time, the death or unavailability of witnesses, or the
destruction of evidence.
(4) (a) An action filed under this section shall be brought in accordance with the
Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure and within two (2) years after:
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1329
1. a. The claimant's conviction was reversed or vacated and the
criminal charges against the claimant were dismissed;
b. The court entered a judgment of not guilty on retrial; or
c. The appeals process has been exhausted;
whichever is later; or
2. The grant of a pardon to the claimant.
(b) An action filed under this section by a claimant who has been convicted,
imprisoned, and released from the custody of the Department of Corrections
before the effective date of this Act shall be brought no later than two (2)
years after the effective date of this Act.
(c) An action filed under this section shall be served on the Attorney General
and the Commonwealth's attorney in the county where the conviction
occurred in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.
(5) (a) Subject to any adjustment made under paragraph (e) of this subsection,
damages awarded under this section shall be equal to:
1. Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection:
a. Sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) for each year of
imprisonment; or
b. Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for each year of
imprisonment if the claimant was imprisoned with a death
sentence; and
2. Thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($32,500) for each
additional year:
a. Served on parole or postincarceration supervision; or
b. The claimant registered as a sex offender under KRS 17.510;
whichever is greater.
(b) Amounts awarded under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be:
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1329
1. Determined on a pro rata basis to the number of days the claimant
spent imprisoned or under supervision, or registered as a sex offender
under KRS 17.510; and
2. Issued as twenty-four (24) payments per year, to be made twice a
month, over a period of three (3) years.
(c) A claimant shall not receive compensation for any:
1. Period of incarceration that the claimant was concurrently serving
under a sentence; and
2. Period of time that the claimant was concurrently registered as a sex
offender under KRS 17.510;
for a conviction of another felony crime that the claimant committed.
(d) In addition to damages awarded pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the claimant shall be entitled to:
1. Receive reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in the action
brought under this section not to exceed a total of twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000), unless a greater award is authorized by
the court upon a finding of good cause shown, not to exceed the
maximum hourly rate provided in the Legal Services Duties and
Maximum Rate Schedule promulgated by the Government Contract
Review Committee established pursuant to KRS 45A.705;
2. Receive a tuition waiver for up to one hundred twenty (120) credit
hours, and waiver of any mandatory fees associated with attendance,
at any public postsecondary educational institution in Kentucky;
3. Reimbursement for all restitution, assessments, fees, court costs, and
all other sums paid by the claimant, whether arising from the charge
that is the subject of an action under this section, as required by
pretrial orders, judgment of conviction, or sentence in any proceeding
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1329
that gave rise to the conviction, or arising from proceedings related to
the reversal or vacation of the conviction, or retrial following a
reversal;
4. Reimbursement for any reasonable reintegrative services and mental
and physical health care costs incurred by the claimant for the time
period between his or her release from incarceration and the entry of
judgment under this section not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000), unless a greater award is authorized by the court upon a
finding of good cause shown; and
5. a. Satisfaction of:
i. Child support payments owed by the claimant that became
due, and the legal rate of interest on child support
arrearages that accrued, during the time the claimant was
incarcerated; and
ii. Any payments owed by the claimant under any order issued
under KRS 403.211.
b. The amounts owed under subdivision a. of this subparagraph
shall:
i. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 413.090, be
awarded to the party designated in the applicable order to
receive payments; and
ii. Not include any amounts accrued by the claimant prior to
his or her incarceration, which shall remain the obligation
of the claimant.
(e) 1. Beginning July 1, 2027, and every year thereafter, the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall determine the percentage change in the
cost of living, based on the percent increase in the nonseasonally
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1329
adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, (CPI-U) U.S. City Average, All Items, between the two (2)
most recent calendar years available, as published by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics.
2. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall adjust the amounts
under paragraph (a) of this subsection for the following calendar year
by multiplying the amounts applicable to the calendar year that the
adjustment is made by the percentage amount determined under this
paragraph. The adjustment shall not exceed three percent (3%) for
any year. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall round the
adjusted limitation amount to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100),
but the unrounded amount shall be used to calculate the adjustments
to the amounts in subsequent calendar years.
3. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall inform the
Administrative Office of the Courts of any adjustment made under this
paragraph as soon as practicable.
4. The adjusted amounts shall become effective on July 1 of the year in
which the adjustment is made, and apply to all claims filed under this
section on or after that date and before July 1 of the subsequent year.
(6) (a) If, at the time of entry of a judgment awarding damages under subsection
(5) of this section, the claimant has previously received a monetary award
against the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the
Commonwealth in another civil action related to the wrongful conviction, or
has entered into a settlement agreement with the Commonwealth or any
political subdivision of the Commonwealth related to the wrongful
conviction, the amount of the award in the previous civil action or the
amount received in settlement, less any sums paid to attorneys or for costs
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1329
in litigating the previous civil action or in obtaining the settlement, shall be
deducted from the sum of money that the claimant is entitled to receive
under this section. The court shall include in the judgment an offset to the
Commonwealth of any amount deducted pursuant to this subsection.
(b) If there has been no previous award or settlement under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and if, after the time of the entry of a judgment awarding
damages under subsection (5) of this section, the claimant receives a
monetary award against the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of
the Commonwealth in a civil action related to the wrongful conviction, or
enters into a settlement agreement with the Commonwealth or any political
subdivision of the Commonwealth related to the wrongful conviction, the
claimant shall reimburse the Commonwealth for the sum of money paid
under subsection (5) of this section, less any sums paid to attorneys or for
costs in litigating the subsequent civil action or obtaining the settlement.
Any reimbursement required under this subsection shall not exceed the
amount of the monetary award the claimant receives for damages in the
civil action or the amount received in the settlement.
(7) If the court finds that the claimant is entitled to a judgment under subsection (5)
of this section, the court shall issue a certificate of innocence stating that the
claimant was innocent of all crimes of which the claimant was wrongfully
convicted. The court shall send a certified copy of the certificate of innocence and
the entry of judgment to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
for payment in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(8) Upon entry of judgment and motion by the claimant, the court shall order the:
(a) Associated convictions and arrest records sealed and expunged from all
applicable state and federal systems regardless of whether the claimant has
prior criminal convictions; and
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1329
(b) Expungement and destruction of the associated biological samples
authorized by and given to the Department of Kentucky State Police in
accordance with KRS 17.175. Nothing in this paragraph shall require the
Department of Kentucky State Police to expunge and destroy any samples or
profile records associated with the claimant that are related to any offense
other than the offense for which the court has issued a certificate of
innocence.
(9) Upon request by the claimant, the Department of Corrections shall provide
reentry services to a claimant that are provided to other persons, including but
not limited to financial assistance, housing assistance, mentoring, and
counseling. Services shall be provided while an action under this section is
pending and after any judgment is entered, as appropriate for the claimant.
(10) Upon entry of any final judgment in the Circuit Court in an action under this
section, the judgment may be appealed directly to the Kentucky Supreme Court.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the wrongful conviction compensation fund. The fund shall consist of
moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used to compensate individuals who have
been wrongfully convicted and are entitled to compensation under Section 1 of
this Act and for no other purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) In the event the amount in the wrongful conviction compensation fund is
insufficient to compensate eligible individuals who have been wrongfully
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1329
convicted and are entitled to compensation under Section 1 of this Act, the
unpaid claims shall be deemed a necessary government expense and shall be paid
from the general fund surplus account under KRS 48.700 or the budget reserve
trust fund account under KRS 48.705.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 1/22/2026 5:43 PM Jacketed